Oklahoma, session 2025, SB990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 106 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Pursuant to the authorization provided in Section 2 of Article
VIII of the Oklahoma Constitution, all statewide elected officers
not subject to impeachment pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of Article VIII of the Oklahoma Constitution, shall be subject to
removal from office through a recall election as provided in this
act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 107 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


ENGR. S. B. NO. 990 Page 1

A. The Legislature may initiate the recall election procedure
of a statewide elected officer as provided in Section 1 of this act
by:
1. Introducing a joint resolution by either the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives
stating the purpose and the reason or reasons for removal;
2. Providing a provision in the joint resolution stating a date
certain for an election by the citizens of this state to be
conducted for the purpose of the recall of the statewide elected
officer;
3. Obtaining approval of the joint resolution by the
Legislature; and
4. After approval by the Legislature, filing the joint
resolution with the Secretary of State.
B. A joint resolution filed for the purposes of this act shall
not be subject to regular legislative cutoff dates and shall only
contain the subject of one statewide elected office. The joint
resolution for this purpose shall not be subject to a gubernatorial
veto.
C. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall cause
ballots to be printed for statewide recall of the statewide elected
officer at such time as to ensure delivery of the ballots to county
election boards for distribution to the several precinct election
boards prior to election day. The election shall be conducted in a
ENGR. S. B. NO. 990 Page 2

mann er consistent with the laws on the conduct of elections. A
resignation of an officer subject to a recall election prior to the
election date specified shall end the process of conducting an
election.
D. The question to be posed on the ballot is whether the
statewide elected official as named shall be removed from the
position. The removal of the statewide elected officer shall take
effect and be in force upon the approval by a majority of the votes
cast on the issue as certified by the State Election Board.
A statewide elected officer removed from office pursuant to the
recall election provided by this act shall create a vacancy. The
vacancy of the statewide elected officer shall be filled by an
appointment made by the Governor for the remainder of the term.
E. The filing of a contest or petition for recount shall be
conducted in the same manner as provided by law.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.








ENGR. S. B. NO. 990 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 27th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 990 Page 4